Maryland, session 2026, HB1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 5 – Calvert County
6–103.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1158*

HOUSE BILL 1158
(a) When it is advantageous to the county to do so, the county may contract to
purchase supplies or services for periods of more than one year if:
(1) Funds for the total cost of the contract are available at the time the
contract is executed; or
(2) Subject to Subsection (c) of this section, a contract requiring the
payment of funds from appropriations of more than one fiscal year is approved by resolution
of the Commissioners.
(E) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COUNTY MAY ENTER INTO A CONTRACT THAT IS FOR A TERM OF NOT MORE THAN 20
YEARS FOR INFRASTRUCTURE OR ASSET MANAGEMENT PROGRAMS WHERE THE
INFRASTRUCTURE OR ASSET HAS A LIFE CYCLE OF NOT LESS THAN 15 YEARS,
INCLUDING:
(I) WATER TOWERS;
(II) FLOW METERS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER WATER AND SEWER ASSETS.
(2) AN INFRASTRUCTURE OR ASSET MANAGEMENT PROGRAM UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE PLANNING, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, MAINTENANCE, MODIFICATION, REVITALIZATION,
AND DECOMMISSIONING OF QUALIFYING INFRASTRUCTURE OR ASSETS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.